Utah statutes.
63H-1-703.   Authority report.
(1) (a)  On or before November 1 of each year, the authority shall prepare and
file a report with the county auditor, the State Tax Commission, the State
Board of Education, and each taxing entity that levies a tax on property from
which the authority collects tax increment.
(b)  The requirement of Subsection (1)(a) to file a copy of the report with
the state as a taxing entity is met if the authority files a copy with the
State Tax Commission and the state auditor.
(2)  Each report under Subsection (1) shall contain:
(a)  an estimate of the tax increment to be paid to the authority for the
calendar year ending December 31; and
(b)  an estimate of the tax increment to be paid to the authority for the
calendar year beginning the next January 1.
